en: EV connector/adapter direction: CCS1 vehicle inlet to CHAdeMO plug; CCS1 vehicle inlet to J1772 plug; CCS1 vehicle inlet to Tesla (NACS) plug; CHAdeMO vehicle inlet to CCS1 plug; CHAdeMO vehicle inlet to Tesla (NACS) plug; J1772 vehicle inlet to CCS1 plug; J1772 vehicle inlet to Tesla (NACS) plug; Tesla (NACS) vehicle inlet to CCS1 plug; Tesla (NACS) vehicle inlet to CHAdeMO plug; Tesla (NACS) vehicle inlet to J1772 plug; Type 1 (J1772) vehicle inl...; Type 2 (Mennekes) vehicle inlet to Type 1 (J1772) plug; Other
de: Richtung des EV-Anschlusses/-Adapters: CCS1-Fahrzeuganschluss auf CHAdeMO-Stecker; CCS1-Fahrzeuganschluss auf J1772-Stecker; CCS1-Fahrzeuganschluss auf Tesla-Stecker (NACS); CHAdeMO-Fahrzeuganschluss auf CCS1-Stecker; CHAdeMO-Fahrzeuganschluss auf Tesla-Stecker (NACS); J1772-Fahrzeuganschluss auf CCS1-Stecker; J1772-Fahrzeuganschluss auf Tesla-Stecker (NACS); Tesla-Fahrzeuganschluss (NACS) auf CCS1-Stecker; Tesla-Fahrzeuganschluss (NACS) auf CHAdeMO-Stecker; Tesla-Fahrzeuganschluss (NACS) auf J1772-Stecker; Typ-1-Fahrzeuganschluss (J1772) ...; Typ-2-Fahrzeuganschluss (Mennekes) auf Typ-1-Stecker (J1772); Sonstige
nb: EV tilkobling/adapter retning: CCS1-bilinntak til CHAdeMO-plugg; CCS1-bilinntak til J1772-plugg; CCS1-bilinntak til Tesla-plugg (NACS); CHAdeMO-bilinntak til CCS1-plugg; CHAdeMO-bilinntak til Tesla-plugg (NACS); J1772-bilinntak til CCS1-plugg; J1772-bilinntak til Tesla-plugg (NACS); Tesla-bilinntak (NACS) til CCS1-plugg; Tesla-bilinntak (NACS) til CHAdeMO-plugg; Tesla-bilinntak (NACS) til J1772-plugg; Type 1-bilinntak (J1772) ...; Type 2-bilinntak (Mennekes) til Type 1-plugg (J1772); Annet
es: Dirección del conector o adaptador del vehículo eléctrico: Entrada de vehículo CCS1 a enchufe CHAdeMO; Entrada de vehículo CCS1 a enchufe J1772; Entrada de vehículo CCS1 a enchufe Tesla (NACS); Entrada de vehículo CHAdeMO a enchufe CCS1; Entrada de vehículo CHAdeMO a enchufe Tesla (NACS); Entrada de vehículo J1772 a enchufe CCS1; Entrada de vehículo J1772 a enchufe Tesla (NACS); Entrada de vehículo Tesla (NACS) a enchufe CCS1; Entrada de vehículo Tesla (NACS) a enchufe CHAdeMO; Entrada de vehículo Tesla (NACS) a enchufe J1772; Entrada de vehículo tipo 1 (J1772)...; Entrada de vehículo tipo 2 (Mennekes) a enchufe tipo 1 (J1772); Otro
ro-RO: Direcția conectorului/adaptorului EV: Priză vehicul CCS1 la mufă CHAdeMO; Priză vehicul CCS1 la mufă J1772; Priză vehicul CCS1 la mufă Tesla (NACS); Priză vehicul CHAdeMO la mufă CCS1; Priză vehicul CHAdeMO la mufă Tesla (NACS); Priză vehicul J1772 la mufă CCS1; Priză vehicul J1772 la mufă Tesla (NACS); Priză vehicul Tesla (NACS) la mufă CCS1; Priză vehicul Tesla (NACS) la mufă CHAdeMO; Priză vehicul Tesla (NACS) la mufă J1772; Priză vehicul tip 1 (J1772)...; Priză vehicul tip 2 (Mennekes) la mufă tip 1 (J1772); Altele
pl: Kierunek konektora/adaptera EV: Gniazdo pojazdu CCS1 na wtyczkę CHAdeMO; Gniazdo pojazdu CCS1 na wtyczkę J1772; Gniazdo pojazdu CCS1 na wtyczkę Tesla (NACS); Gniazdo pojazdu CHAdeMO na wtyczkę CCS1; Gniazdo pojazdu CHAdeMO na wtyczkę Tesla (NACS); Gniazdo pojazdu J1772 na wtyczkę CCS1; Gniazdo pojazdu J1772 na wtyczkę Tesla (NACS); Gniazdo pojazdu Tesla (NACS) na wtyczkę CCS1; Gniazdo pojazdu Tesla (NACS) na wtyczkę CHAdeMO; Gniazdo pojazdu Tesla (NACS) na wtyczkę J1772; Gniazdo pojazdu Typu 1 (J1772)...; Gniazdo pojazdu Typu 2 (Mennekes) na wtyczkę Typu 1 (J1772); Inne
fr: Sens de conversion du connecteur ou de l’adaptateur pour véhicule électrique: Prise véhicule CCS1 vers fiche CHAdeMO; Prise véhicule CCS1 vers fiche J1772; Prise véhicule CCS1 vers fiche Tesla (NACS); Prise véhicule CHAdeMO vers fiche CCS1; Prise véhicule CHAdeMO vers fiche Tesla (NACS); Prise véhicule J1772 vers fiche CCS1; Prise véhicule J1772 vers fiche Tesla (NACS); Prise véhicule Tesla (NACS) vers fiche CCS1; Prise véhicule Tesla (NACS) vers fiche CHAdeMO; Prise véhicule Tesla (NACS) vers fiche J1772; Prise véhicule Type 1 (J1772)...; Prise véhicule Type 2 (Mennekes) vers fiche Type 1 (J1772); Autre
da: Elbil-stik/-adapters retning: CCS1-bilindtag til CHAdeMO-stik; CCS1-bilindtag til J1772-stik; CCS1-bilindtag til Tesla-stik (NACS); CHAdeMO-bilindtag til CCS1-stik; CHAdeMO-bilindtag til Tesla-stik (NACS); J1772-bilindtag til CCS1-stik; J1772-bilindtag til Tesla-stik (NACS); Tesla-bilindtag (NACS) til CCS1-stik; Tesla-bilindtag (NACS) til CHAdeMO-stik; Tesla-bilindtag (NACS) til J1772-stik; Type 1-bilindtag (J1772)...; Type 2-bilindtag (Mennekes) til Type 1-stik (J1772); Andet
it: Direzione del connettore/adattatore EV: Da presa veicolo CCS1 a spina CHAdeMO; Da presa veicolo CCS1 a spina J1772; Da presa veicolo CCS1 a spina Tesla (NACS); Da presa veicolo CHAdeMO a spina CCS1; Da presa veicolo CHAdeMO a spina Tesla (NACS); Da presa veicolo J1772 a spina CCS1; Da presa veicolo J1772 a spina Tesla (NACS); Da presa veicolo Tesla (NACS) a spina CCS1; Da presa veicolo Tesla (NACS) a spina CHAdeMO; Da presa veicolo Tesla (NACS) a spina J1772; Da presa veicolo di tipo 1 (J1772)...; Da presa veicolo di tipo 2 (Mennekes) a spina di tipo 1 (J1772); Altro
el: Κατεύθυνση συνδέσμου/προσαρμογέα EV: Υποδοχή οχήματος CCS1 σε βύσμα CHAdeMO; Υποδοχή οχήματος CCS1 σε βύσμα J1772; Υποδοχή οχήματος CCS1 σε βύσμα Tesla (NACS); Υποδοχή οχήματος CHAdeMO σε βύσμα CCS1; Υποδοχή οχήματος CHAdeMO σε βύσμα Tesla (NACS); Υποδοχή οχήματος J1772 σε βύσμα CCS1; Υποδοχή οχήματος J1772 σε βύσμα Tesla (NACS); Υποδοχή οχήματος Tesla (NACS) σε βύσμα CCS1; Υποδοχή οχήματος Tesla (NACS) σε βύσμα CHAdeMO; Υποδοχή οχήματος Tesla (NACS) σε βύσμα J1772; Υποδοχή οχήμ. Type 1 (J1772)...; Υποδοχή οχήματος Type 2 (Mennekes) σε βύσμα Type 1 (J1772); Άλλο
nl: Elektrisch voertuig connector/adapter richting: CCS1-voertuigaansluiting naar CHAdeMO-stekker; CCS1-voertuigaansluiting naar J1772-stekker; CCS1-voertuigaansluiting naar Tesla (NACS)-stekker; CHAdeMO-voertuigaansluiting naar CCS1-stekker; CHAdeMO-voertuigaansluiting naar Tesla (NACS)-stekker; J1772-voertuigaansluiting naar CCS1-stekker; J1772-voertuigaansluiting naar Tesla (NACS)-stekker; Tesla (NACS)-voertuigaansluiting naar CCS1-stekker; Tesla (NACS)-voertuigaansluiting naar CHAdeMO-stekker; Tesla (NACS)-voertuigaansluiting naar J1772-stekker; Type 1 (J1772)-voertuigaansl...; Type 2 (Mennekes)-voertuigaansluiting naar Type 1 (J1772)-stekker; Overig
ru: Направление разъема/адаптера для электромобиля: Разъем электромобиля CCS1 — штекер CHAdeMO; Разъем электромобиля CCS1 — штекер J1772; Разъем электромобиля CCS1 — штекер Tesla (NACS); Разъем электромобиля CHAdeMO — штекер CCS1; Разъем электромобиля CHAdeMO — штекер Tesla (NACS); Разъем электромобиля J1772 — штекер CCS1; Разъем электромобиля J1772 — штекер Tesla (NACS); Разъем электромобиля Tesla (NACS) — штекер CCS1; Разъем электромобиля Tesla (NACS) — штекер CHAdeMO; Разъем электромобиля Tesla (NACS) — штекер J1772; Разъем электромобиля Type 1 (J1772)...; Разъем электромобиля Type 2 (Mennekes) — штекер Type 1 (J1772); Другое
pt-PT: Direção do conector/adaptador EV: Entrada de veículo CCS1 para ficha CHAdeMO; Entrada de veículo CCS1 para ficha J1772; Entrada de veículo CCS1 para ficha Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo CHAdeMO para ficha CCS1; Entrada de veículo CHAdeMO para ficha Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo J1772 para ficha CCS1; Entrada de veículo J1772 para ficha Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para ficha CCS1; Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para ficha CHAdeMO; Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para ficha J1772; Entrada de veículo tipo 1 (J1772)...; Entrada de veículo tipo 2 (Mennekes) para ficha tipo 1 (J1772); Outro
lt-LT: EV jungties / adapterio kryptis: CCS1 transporto priemonės lizdas į CHAdeMO kištuką; CCS1 transporto priemonės lizdas į J1772 kištuką; CCS1 transporto priemonės lizdas į „Tesla“ (NACS) kištuką; CHAdeMO transporto priemonės lizdas į CCS1 kištuką; CHAdeMO transporto priemonės lizdas į „Tesla“ (NACS) kištuką; J1772 transporto priemonės lizdas į CCS1 kištuką; J1772 transporto priemonės lizdas į „Tesla“ (NACS) kištuką; „Tesla“ (NACS) transporto priemonės lizdas į CCS1 kištuką; „Tesla“ (NACS) transporto priemonės lizdas į CHAdeMO kištuką; „Tesla“ (NACS) transporto priemonės lizdas į J1772 kištuką; 1 tipo (J1772) transporto priemonės liz...; 2 tipo („Mennekes“) transporto priemonės lizdas į 1 tipo (J1772) kištuką; Kita
zh-TW: 電動車連接器/轉接器方向: CCS1 車輛插口轉 CHAdeMO 插頭; CCS1 車輛插口轉 J1772 插頭; CCS1 車輛插口轉 Tesla (NACS) 插頭; CHAdeMO 車輛插口轉 CCS1 插頭; CHAdeMO 車輛插口轉 Tesla (NACS) 插頭; J1772 車輛插口轉 CCS1 插頭; J1772 車輛插口轉 Tesla (NACS) 插頭; Tesla (NACS) 車輛插口轉 CCS1 插頭; Tesla (NACS) 車輛插口轉 CHAdeMO 插頭; Tesla (NACS) 車輛插口轉 J1772 插頭; Type 1 (J1772) 車輛插...; Type 2 (Mennekes) 車輛插口轉 Type 1 (J1772) 插頭; 其他
zh-CN: 电动汽车连接器/适配器方向: CCS1 车辆接口转 CHAdeMO 插头; CCS1 车辆接口转 J1772 插头; CCS1 车辆接口转 Tesla (NACS) 插头; CHAdeMO 车辆接口转 CCS1 插头; CHAdeMO 车辆接口转 Tesla (NACS) 插头; J1772 车辆接口转 CCS1 插头; J1772 车辆接口转 Tesla (NACS) 插头; Tesla (NACS) 车辆接口转 CCS1 插头; Tesla (NACS) 车辆接口转 CHAdeMO 插头; Tesla (NACS) 车辆接口转 J1772 插头; Type 1 (J1772) 车辆接口...; Type 2 (Mennekes) 车辆接口转 Type 1 (J1772) 插头; 其他
hu: Elektromos jármű csatlakozó/adapter iránya: CCS1 járműaljzatról CHAdeMO csatlakozódugóra; CCS1 járműaljzatról J1772 csatlakozódugóra; CCS1 járműaljzatról Tesla (NACS) csatlakozódugóra; CHAdeMO járműaljzatról CCS1 csatlakozódugóra; CHAdeMO járműaljzatról Tesla (NACS) csatlakozódugóra; J1772 járműaljzatról CCS1 csatlakozódugóra; J1772 járműaljzatról Tesla (NACS) csatlakozódugóra; Tesla (NACS) járműaljzatról CCS1 csatlakozódugóra; Tesla (NACS) járműaljzatról CHAdeMO csatlakozódugóra; Tesla (NACS) járműaljzatról J1772 csatlakozódugóra; Type 1 (J1772) járműaljza...; Type 2 (Mennekes) járműaljzatról Type 1 (J1772) csatlakozódugóra; Egyéb
cs: Směr konektoru/adaptéru pro elektromobily: Ze zásuvky vozidla CCS1 na zástrčku CHAdeMO; Vozidlová zásuvka CCS1 na zástrčku J1772; Vozidlová zásuvka CCS1 na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Vozidlová zásuvka CHAdeMO na zástrčku CCS1; Vozidlová zásuvka CHAdeMO na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Vozidlová zásuvka J1772 na zástrčku CCS1; Vozidlová zásuvka J1772 na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Vozidlová zásuvka Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku CCS1; Vozidlová zásuvka Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku CHAdeMO; Vozidlová zásuvka Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku J1772; Vozidlová zásuvka typu 1 (J1772)...; Vozidlová zásuvka typu 2 (Mennekes) na zástrčku typu 1 (J1772); Jiné
bg-BG: Посока на конектора/адаптера за електрически превозни средства: CCS1 вход на превозното средство към CHAdeMO щепсел; CCS1 вход на превозното средство към J1772 щепсел; CCS1 вход на превозното средство към Tesla (NACS) щепсел; CHAdeMO вход на превозното средство към CCS1 щепсел; CHAdeMO вход на превозното средство към Tesla (NACS) щепсел; J1772 вход на превозното средство към CCS1 щепсел; J1772 вход на превозното средство към Tesla (NACS) щепсел; Tesla (NACS) вход на превозното средство към CCS1 щепсел; Tesla (NACS) вход на превозното средство към CHAdeMO щепсел; Tesla (NACS) вход на превозното средство към J1772 щепсел; Вход на превозното средство тип 1 (J1772)...; Вход на превозното средство тип 2 (Mennekes) към щепсел тип 1 (J1772); Други
th: ทิศทางของตัวเชื่อมต่อ/อะแดปเตอร์ EV: ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ CCS1 ไปยังปลั๊ก CHAdeMO; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ CCS1 ไปยังปลั๊ก J1772; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ CCS1 ไปยังปลั๊ก Tesla (NACS); ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ CHAdeMO ไปยังปลั๊ก CCS1; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ CHAdeMO ไปยังปลั๊ก Tesla (NACS); ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ J1772 ไปยังปลั๊ก CCS1; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ J1772 ไปยังปลั๊ก Tesla (NACS); ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ Tesla (NACS) ไปยังปลั๊ก CCS1; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ Tesla (NACS) ไปยังปลั๊ก CHAdeMO; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ Tesla (NACS) ไปยังปลั๊ก J1772; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ Type 1 (J1772)...; ช่องรับไฟรถยนต์ Type 2 (Mennekes) ไปยังปลั๊ก Type 1 (J1772); อื่นๆ
fi: EV-liittimen/sovittimen suunta: CCS1-ajoneuvoliitäntä – CHAdeMO-pistoke; CCS1-ajoneuvoliitäntä – J1772-pistoke; CCS1-ajoneuvoliitäntä – Tesla (NACS) -pistoke; CHAdeMO-ajoneuvoliitäntä – CCS1-pistoke; CHAdeMO-ajoneuvoliitäntä – Tesla (NACS) -pistoke; J1772-ajoneuvoliitäntä – CCS1-pistoke; J1772-ajoneuvoliitäntä – Tesla (NACS) -pistoke; Tesla (NACS) -ajoneuvoliitäntä – CCS1-pistoke; Tesla (NACS) -ajoneuvoliitäntä – CHAdeMO-pistoke; Tesla (NACS) -ajoneuvoliitäntä – J1772-pistoke; Tyypin 1 (J1772) ajoneuvoliit...; Tyypin 2 (Mennekes) ajoneuvoliitäntä – tyypin 1 (J1772) pistoke; Muu
ja: EVコネクター／アダプター方向: CCS1 車両インレットから CHAdeMO プラグ; CCS1 車両インレットから J1772 プラグ; CCS1 車両インレットから Tesla (NACS) プラグ; CHAdeMO 車両インレットから CCS1 プラグ; CHAdeMO 車両インレットから Tesla (NACS) プラグ; J1772 車両インレットから CCS1 プラグ; J1772 車両インレットから Tesla (NACS) プラグ; Tesla (NACS) 車両インレットから CCS1 プラグ; Tesla (NACS) 車両インレットから CHAdeMO プラグ; Tesla (NACS) 車両インレットから J1772 プラグ; Type 1 (J1772) 車両インレ...; Type 2 (Mennekes) 車両インレットから Type 1 (J1772) プラグ; その他
tr: EV bağlayıcı/adaptör yönü: CCS1 araç girişinden CHAdeMO fişine; CCS1 araç girişinden J1772 fişine; CCS1 araç girişinden Tesla (NACS) fişine; CHAdeMO araç girişinden CCS1 fişine; CHAdeMO araç girişinden Tesla (NACS) fişine; J1772 araç girişinden CCS1 fişine; J1772 araç girişinden Tesla (NACS) fişine; Tesla (NACS) araç girişinden CCS1 fişine; Tesla (NACS) araç girişinden CHAdeMO fişine; Tesla (NACS) araç girişinden J1772 fişine; Tip 1 (J1772) araç giriş...; Tip 2 (Mennekes) araç girişinden Tip 1 (J1772) fişine; Diğer
sv: Riktning för EV-kontakt/adapter: CCS1-fordonsintag till CHAdeMO-kontakt; CCS1-fordonsintag till J1772-kontakt; CCS1-fordonsintag till Tesla-kontakt (NACS); CHAdeMO-fordonsintag till CCS1-kontakt; CHAdeMO-fordonsintag till Tesla-kontakt (NACS); J1772-fordonsintag till CCS1-kontakt; J1772-fordonsintag till Tesla-kontakt (NACS); Tesla-fordonsintag (NACS) till CCS1-kontakt; Tesla-fordonsintag (NACS) till CHAdeMO-kontakt; Tesla-fordonsintag (NACS) till J1772-kontakt; Typ 1-fordonsintag (J1772)...; Typ 2-fordonsintag (Mennekes) till Typ 1-kontakt (J1772); Övrigt
hr-HR: Smjer EV priključka/adaptera: Utičnica CCS1 na vozilu na utikač CHAdeMO; Utičnica CCS1 na vozilu na utikač J1772; Utičnica CCS1 na vozilu na utikač Tesla (NACS); Utičnica CHAdeMO na vozilu na utikač CCS1; Utičnica CHAdeMO na vozilu na utikač Tesla (NACS); Utičnica J1772 na vozilu na utikač CCS1; Utičnica J1772 na vozilu na utikač Tesla (NACS); Utičnica Tesla (NACS) na vozilu na utikač CCS1; Utičnica Tesla (NACS) na vozilu na utikač CHAdeMO; Utičnica Tesla (NACS) na vozilu na utikač J1772; Utičnica tipa 1 (J1772) na vozil...; Utičnica tipa 2 (Mennekes) na vozilu na utikač tipa 1 (J1772); Ostalo
sk-SK: Smer konektora/adaptéra pre elektromobily: Zásuvka vozidla CCS1 na zástrčku CHAdeMO; Zásuvka vozidla CCS1 na zástrčku J1772; Zásuvka vozidla CCS1 na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Zásuvka vozidla CHAdeMO na zástrčku CCS1; Zásuvka vozidla CHAdeMO na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Zásuvka vozidla J1772 na zástrčku CCS1; Zásuvka vozidla J1772 na zástrčku Tesla (NACS); Zásuvka vozidla Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku CCS1; Zásuvka vozidla Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku CHAdeMO; Zásuvka vozidla Tesla (NACS) na zástrčku J1772; Zásuvka vozidla typu 1 (J1772)...; Zásuvka vozidla typu 2 (Mennekes) na zástrčku typu 1 (J1772); Iné
ko: EV 커넥터/어댑터 변환 방향: CCS1 차량 인렛 - CHAdeMO 플러그; CCS1 차량 인렛 - J1772 플러그; CCS1 차량 인렛 - Tesla(NACS) 플러그; CHAdeMO 차량 인렛 - CCS1 플러그; CHAdeMO 차량 인렛 - Tesla(NACS) 플러그; J1772 차량 인렛 - CCS1 플러그; J1772 차량 인렛 - Tesla(NACS) 플러그; Tesla(NACS) 차량 인렛 - CCS1 플러그; Tesla(NACS) 차량 인렛 - CHAdeMO 플러그; Tesla(NACS) 차량 인렛 - J1772 플러그; 타입 1(J1772) 차량 인렛...; 타입 2(Mennekes) 차량 인렛 - 타입 1(J1772) 플러그; 기타
sl-SI: Smer priključka/adapterja za električna vozila: Vtičnica na vozilu CCS1 na vtič CHAdeMO; Vtičnica na vozilu CCS1 na vtič J1772; Vtičnica na vozilu CCS1 na vtič Tesla (NACS); Vtičnica na vozilu CHAdeMO na vtič CCS1; Vtičnica na vozilu CHAdeMO na vtič Tesla (NACS); Vtičnica na vozilu J1772 na vtič CCS1; Vtičnica na vozilu J1772 na vtič Tesla (NACS); Vtičnica na vozilu Tesla (NACS) na vtič CCS1; Vtičnica na vozilu Tesla (NACS) na vtič CHAdeMO; Vtičnica na vozilu Tesla (NACS) na vtič J1772; Vtičnica na vozilu tip 1 (J1772)...; Vtičnica na vozilu tip 2 (Mennekes) na vtič tip 1 (J1772); Drugo
vi: Hướng kết nối/bộ chuyển đổi EV: Cổng sạc xe CCS1 sang đầu cắm CHAdeMO; Cổng sạc xe CCS1 sang đầu cắm J1772; Cổng sạc xe CCS1 sang đầu cắm Tesla (NACS); Cổng sạc xe CHAdeMO sang đầu cắm CCS1; Cổng sạc xe CHAdeMO sang đầu cắm Tesla (NACS); Cổng sạc xe J1772 sang đầu cắm CCS1; Cổng sạc xe J1772 sang đầu cắm Tesla (NACS); Cổng sạc xe Tesla (NACS) sang đầu cắm CCS1; Cổng sạc xe Tesla (NACS) sang đầu cắm CHAdeMO; Cổng sạc xe Tesla (NACS) sang đầu cắm J1772; Cổng sạc xe Loại 1 (J1772)…; Cổng sạc xe Loại 2 (Mennekes) sang đầu cắm Loại 1 (J1772); Khác
pt-BR: Direção do conector/adaptador EV: Entrada de veículo CCS1 para conector CHAdeMO; Entrada de veículo CCS1 para conector J1772; Entrada de veículo CCS1 para conector Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo CHAdeMO para conector CCS1; Entrada de veículo CHAdeMO para conector Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo J1772 para conector CCS1; Entrada de veículo J1772 para conector Tesla (NACS); Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para conector CCS1; Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para conector CHAdeMO; Entrada de veículo Tesla (NACS) para conector J1772; Entrada de veículo tipo 1 (J1772)...; Entrada de veículo tipo 2 (Mennekes) para conector tipo 1 (J1772); Outro